Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.036

Business transactions of member or manager with the limited liability company.

A member or manager may lend money to and transact other business with a limited liability company and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect to the loan or other transaction as a person who is not a member or manager.

[ 2015 c 188 s 10.]